Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-189
Banks; attempted prevention of possession by department; penalty.

Any officer, director, or employee of a bank, who shall attempt to prevent the department from taking possession of such bank, shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1923, c. 191, § 14, p. 445;

C.S.1929, § 8-184;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 46, p. 159;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-184;

R.S.1943, § 8-175;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 89, p. 169;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 52.